Utah statutes.
63G-6a-711.   Procurement for submitted proposal.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Committee" is as defined in Section 63M-1-2602.

(b)  "Initial proposal" is a proposal submitted by a private entity under Section 63M-1-2605.

(2)  After receipt by the chief procurement officer of a copy of an initial proposal from the committee in accordance with Subsection 63M-1-2606(5), including any comment, suggestion, or modification to the initial proposal, the chief procurement officer shall initiate a standard procurement process in compliance with this chapter.

(3)  The chief procurement officer or designee shall:

(a)  review each detailed proposal received in accordance with Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program; and

(b)  submit all detailed proposals that meet the guidelines established under Subsection 63M-1-2608(1) to the committee for review under Section 63M-1-2609.

(4)  For purposes of this chapter, the Governor's Office of Economic Development is considered a procurement unit with independent procurement authority for a procurement under Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 26, Government Procurement Private Proposal Program.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

